Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201276-2407
Client, defined.

Client
shall mean a seller, landlord, buyer, or tenant who has entered into a brokerage
relationship with a licensee pursuant to sections 76-2401 to 76-2430 and is
the seller, landlord, buyer, or tenant to whom the licensee owes the duty
as set forth in such sections.

Laws 1994, LB 883, § 7;

Laws 2002, LB 863, § 3;

Laws 2011, LB25, § 4.